Arkansas, session 2025, SB174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-9-410(d), concerning used tire programs,
is reenacted to ratify the decision by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission
to insert “may” in order to correct a grammatical error.
(d) The tire accountability board in each of the used tire programs
may enter into an interlocal agreement to determine the highest level of
efficiency regarding tire processing in the respective used tire program.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-9-802(4)(A), concerning legislative
findings under the Arkansas Nuclear Recycling Program, is amended to read as
follows to clarify a reference:
(A) University of Arkansas system, in conjunction with
other institutions of higher education, can and is willing to provide a
detailed analysis examining the benefits of “New Nuclear” compared to the
risks of continued storage of spent nuclear fuel at Arkansas Nuclear One;

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
*JMB004*
01/31/2025 10:12:00 AM JMB004

SB174
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.




















01/31/2025 10:12:00 AM JMB004